Massachusetts, session 194th, S1299.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:- "Section 11: Each executive
department and agency shall develop, adhere to and update a plan to address the
nondiscrimination provisions as set forth in this chapter. The plan shall apply to all personnel,
including, but not limited to, volunteers and interns, agency line staff, managers, administrators,
executives, contracted vendors and program staff (hereinafter “personnel”). Each plan shall
include, but not be limited to: descriptions of and statements prohibiting discrimination as
outlined in this chapter; procedures for collecting and maintaining demographic data; procedures
for all personnel and others to report discrimination or retaliation; a provision that reports of
discrimination or retaliation may be made anonymously; procedures for promptly responding to
and investigating reports of discrimination or retaliation; the range of disciplinary actions that
of 2

may be taken against a perpetrator for discrimination or retaliation; provided, however, that the
disciplinary actions shall include strategies for protecting a person who reports discrimination
from retaliation and provides information during an investigation of discrimination. The
nondiscrimination plan may detail a plan and timeline for personnel training on
nondiscrimination and equal access under chapter 151B of the general laws. The plan shall be
updated at least biennially.
SECTION 2. Each executive department and agency shall submit nondiscrimination
plans, as outlined in section 1, to the Clerks of the House and Senate, the Joint Committee on the
Judiciary, the Joint Committee on State Administration and Regulatory Oversight, the
Massachusetts Commission Against Discrimination, and Office of Diversity and Equal
Opportunity no later than January 1, 2027.
of 2